California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
Where the department is the construction agency, the city, county or other public agency acting in cooperation with the department in the construction of any federally authorized beach erosion control project shall transmit funds representing its share of the costs to the department for deposit in the State Treasury in advance of commencement of construction work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

67.

The San Diego County Beach Erosion Control Project (Imperial Beach) is authorized for state participation pursuant to Section 65.5 substantially in accordance with the plan set forth in House Document 399, 84th Congress, and authorized by the River and Harbor Act of 1958, Title I of Public Law 85-500, 72 Stat. 297. Such state participation shall be subject to appropriations applicable thereto or funds available therefor and shall not take precedence over other pending projects of higher priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

67.1.

The San Diego (Sunset Cliffs), California, Beach Erosion Control Project is authorized for state participation pursuant to Section 65.5 substantially in accordance with the plan set forth in House Document 477, 89th Congress, and authorized by the River and Harbor Act of 1966, Title I of Public Law 89-789, 80 Stat. 1405. Such state participation shall be subject to appropriations applicable thereto or funds available therefor and shall not take precedence over other pending projects of higher priority. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 65.6, state funds appropriated for this project may be expended prior to the appropriation of construction funds for such project by the Congress.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

67.2.

The Orange County, California, Beach Erosion Control Project is authorized for state participation pursuant to Section 65.5 substantially in accordance with the plan set forth in House Document 602, 87th Congress, and authorized by the River and Harbor Act of 1962, Title I of Public Law 87-874, 76 Stat. 1173. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 65.6, state funds appropriated for this project may be expended prior to the appropriation of construction funds for said project by the Congress. Such state participation shall be subject to appropriations applicable thereto or funds available therefor and shall not take precedence over other pending projects of higher priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

67.3.

The Los Angeles County (Redondo Beach to Malaga Cove) Beach Erosion Control Project is authorized for state participation pursuant to Section 65.5 substantially in accordance with the plans set forth in House Document 277, 83rd Congress, and authorized by the River and Harbor Act of 1954, Title I of Public Law 780, 83rd Congress, Second Session, 68 Stat. 1248. Such state participation shall be subject to appropriations applicable thereto or funds available therefor and shall not take precedence over other pending projects of higher priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

67.4.

The department shall conduct the repair and restoration of the beach and shoreline located adjacent to the Pacific Ocean and in the City of Oceanside if the city does all of the following:

(a) Prepares a plan for the repair and restoration which is approved by the department and the State Coastal Conservancy.

(b) Agrees to commit funds for the repair and restoration equal to the amount of state funds appropriated for the repair and restoration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. California Recreational Boating Trails [68. - 68.2.]

68.

The director shall cause to be prepared, and continuously maintained, a comprehensive plan for the development and operation of a statewide system of recreational boating trails. The plan shall be the boating trails element of the California Recreational Trails System Plan as required pursuant to the California Recreational Trails Act (commencing with Section 5070 of the Public Resources Code). The plan shall be prepared and continually maintained in accordance with provisions of the California Recreational Trails Act and shall, to the maximum extent practicable, be compatible with other elements of the California Recreational Trails System Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 365.)
-------------------------------------------

68.2.

In conformance with the California Recreational Trails Act, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a statewide and continuing interest in the public’s use of the state’s inland waterways for recreational purposes. The Legislature further finds and declares that there exists a need to provide for recreational resource planning of the waterways in a manner that provides access and utilization for recreational purposes, consistent with the provisions of the California Recreational Trails Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 365.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.8. California Public Beach Restoration Act [69.5. - 69.9.]

69.5.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Public Beach Restoration Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 798, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Pursuant to Sec. 3 of Ch. 798, operation of provisions is contingent upon funding in the annual budget act.)
-------------------------------------------

69.6.

(a) The California Public Beach Restoration Program is hereby established, to be administered by the department for all of the following purposes:

(1) The restoration, enhancement, and nourishment of public beaches, as determined to be necessary by the department, through the cost-effective engineered placement of sand on the beach or in the nearshore environment.

(2) The planning, design, and permitting of the beach restoration, nourishment, or enhancement projects specified in paragraph (1), which shall not exceed 15 percent of the total project cost.

(3) The preparation of studies to inventory, characterize, and assess the physical and biological resources of the ocean, and nearshore, shoreline, and inland areas that are determined by the department to be necessary to construct the projects specified in paragraph (1) that are environmentally and economically sound. The cost of the studies shall not exceed 5 percent of the annual program funding.

(4) The funding of 100 percent of the nonfederal project construction cost for restoration, nourishment, or enhancement of coastal state parks and state beaches with placement of sand on the beach or in the nearshore.

(5) The funding of 85 percent of the nonfederal project cost for restoration, nourishment, or enhancement of nonstate public beaches with placement of sand on the beach or in the nearshore, with a 15 percent match from the local sponsors, provided as funds or in-kind services.

(6) The active pursuit and promotion of federal and local partnerships to cost-share beach restoration, nourishment, or enhancement projects specified in paragraph (1) that have significant state benefits.

(b) Prior to funding any project under this section, the department shall develop guidelines that include application requirements and criteria for evaluating a project. The guidelines shall be consistent with the Resources Agency’s policies for shoreline erosion protection. Only beaches that are in public ownership and that are open and accessible to the public are eligible for funding under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 798, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Pursuant to Sec. 3 of Ch. 798, operation of provisions is contingent upon funding in the annual budget act.)
-------------------------------------------

69.9.

(a) The Public Beach Restoration Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The moneys in the fund shall be available for expenditure by the department only for the purposes of the California Public Beach Restoration Program established pursuant to this article.

(b) Of the moneys in the fund, 60 percent shall be available for allocation by the department to projects south of the point at which the Pacific Ocean meets the border between the County of San Luis Obispo and the County of Monterey and 40 percent shall be available for allocation to projects located north of that point.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 798, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Pursuant to Sec. 3 of Ch. 798, operation of provisions is contingent upon funding in the annual budget act.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Small Craft Harbors and Connecting Waterways [70. - 72.9.]

70.

The department may prepare plans for, and acquire, construct, develop, and improve, small craft harbors, facilities in connection with the harbors, and connecting waterways. A small craft harbor so acquired or developed may be transferred, and its operation relinquished, to a county or city, or a district having power to operate a small craft harbor, in which any part of it is located, upon the request of the city, county, or district, if the city, county, or district enters into an agreement with the department for repayment to the state of all costs incurred by the department in acquiring and developing the small craft harbor, including planning costs. The city, county, or district shall be required by the department to repay those costs. The payments shall be made in the amounts and at the times that are
 provided by the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

70.2.

(a) The department may prepare or contract for the preparation of plans for, acquire or contract for the acquisition of, construct or contract for the construction of, develop and improve, or contract for the development and improvement of any portion of coastal small craft harbors that are normally nonrevenue producing, such as jetties, breakwaters, dredging, seawalls, piers, and communication centers.

(b) This program may be conducted in cooperation with the federal government for harbor development along the coastline of California. In those cooperative projects, the department may assume the role of “local sponsor” as that term is used in agreements with the federal government with regard to those projects referred to in
 this section if before the department assumes the role of “local sponsor” it determines to its satisfaction that the local entity that would otherwise be designated as local sponsor cannot fulfill the obligations commensurate with that designation.

(c) If the nonrevenue producing facilities are to be a portion of an existing harbor, the department, prior to construction of those facilities, shall enter into an agreement with the local governing body of the harbor that provides that revenues from harbor operations and harbor district taxes shall serve as security for repayment of the state contribution to the cost of construction and the local governing body shall assume responsibility for the operation and maintenance of the facilities constructed under the agreement.

(d) If nonrevenue producing facilities are to be constructed at a location where no harbor operation is being
 conducted by a governmental entity, the department may initiate construction of the facilities after securing an agreement with the appropriate local jurisdiction that the local entity shall assume the responsibility of operation and maintenance of the facilities, as well as repayment of all related costs of the department, as agreed to in writing.

(e) Harbor facilities provided by the department pursuant to this section shall be defined as nonrevenue producing features for the purpose of the term of repayment under subdivision (a) of Section 71.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 2.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

70.3.

“Harbor of safe refuge” means a port, harbor, inlet, or other body of water normally sheltered from heavy seas by land and in which a vessel can navigate and safely moor, as set forth in Section 70.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

70.4.

No city, county, or district that has received, or is receiving, money under this division for the design, planning, construction, or improvement of a small craft harbor of refuge shall exclude, consistent with the intent of Section 40, the use of that harbor by a commercial boat, or any vessel in need of a safe harbor for refuge purposes. Each vessel entering and using a harbor of safe refuge pursuant to this section shall pay the published fees for services rendered while in the harbor and shall comply with all other applicable local, state, and federal laws while in the harbor and while using any facilities in the harbor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 3.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

70.5.

(a) The following are harbors of safe refuge:

(1) Bodega Bay Harbor.

(2) Channel Islands Harbor.

(3) Crescent City Harbor.

(4) Dana Point Harbor.

(5) Fort Bragg Harbor.

(6) Humboldt Bay Harbor.

(7) Kings Harbor.

(8) Marina del Rey Harbor.

(9) Monterey Harbor.

(10) Morro Bay Harbor.

(11) Moss Landing.

(12) Newport Beach Harbor.

(13) Oceanside Harbor.

(14) Pillar Point Harbor.

(15) Port San Luis Harbor.

(16) Santa Barbara Harbor.

(17) Santa Cruz Harbor.

(18) Ventura Harbor.

(b) The use of any harbor listed in subdivision (a) for safe refuge purposes is subject to the suitability of that location as a harbor of safe refuge as determined by the cognizant Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection, United States Coast Guard, as described in the definition of “harbor of safe refuge” in Section 175.400 of Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 282, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

70.6.

If the department acquires, constructs, develops, or improves a small craft harbor pursuant to Section 70 but receives no request for transfer of its operation to a city, county, or district willing and able to meet the requisite conditions for such a transfer, the department may maintain and operate the harbor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

70.8.

The department may contract with a federal agency, state agency, or city, county, or district, in the design, planning, construction, development, and improvement of small craft harbors pursuant to this chapter, or for the maintenance and operation of any small craft harbors under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

71.

The department may provide for the granting of concessions within the boundaries of harbors under the jurisdiction of the department in order to furnish the public with fuel, oil, food, and other facilities, and may grant easements, rights of way, and permits with respect to such harbors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

71.2.

(a) The department shall protect small craft harbors under its jurisdiction from damage and preserve the peace in those harbors. The director and the employees of the department that the director designates have the authority and powers conferred by law upon peace officers listed in Section 830.33 of the Penal Code for those harbors. The department may adopt rules and regulations that may be necessary for the purposes of this section. A violation of those rules or regulations is a misdemeanor.

(b) A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 5.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

71.4.

(a) (1) The division, subject to the approval of the Legislature in accordance with Section 85.2, may make loans to qualified cities, counties, or districts having power to acquire, construct, and operate small craft harbors, for the design, planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of small craft harbors and facilities in connection with the harbors, and connecting waterways, if the division finds that the project is feasible.

(2) The minimum annual rate of interest charged by the division for a loan shall be set annually by the division and shall be based on the Pooled Money Investment Account interest rate.

(b) The division shall establish,
 by rules and regulations, policies and standards to be followed in making loans pursuant to this section so as to further the proper development and maintenance of a statewide system of small craft harbors and connecting waterways. To the greatest extent possible, the division shall adhere to customary commercial practices to ensure that loans made pursuant to this section are adequately secured and that the loans are repaid consistent with the terms of the loan agreement. Any rules and regulations shall include policies and standards for restrooms, vessel pumpout facilities, oil recycling facilities, and receptacles for the purpose of separating, reusing, or recycling all solid waste materials.

(c) The division shall develop weighing and ranking criteria to qualify and prioritize the public loans.

(d) A loan under this section shall be repaid as provided in Section 70.

(e) Rates to be charged for the use of the boating facilities shall be established by the city, county, or district, subject to the approval of the division, in every loan contract. The division shall concern itself with the rates charged only as prescribed in Section 71.8. The rates set shall be based on a monthly berthing charge, and the division shall monitor these rates to ensure that the berthing charges are sufficient to ensure timely and complete repayment of the loan.

(f) The division may restate an existing loan under this article, upon written request by the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 65.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

71.5.

(a) The department shall encourage cities, counties, and districts that propose to apply for initial loan funding for new small craft harbor development projects pursuant to Section 71.4 to communicate and to work with private enterprise in order to determine if private business could construct and operate the projects’ revenue producing facilities under fair and reasonable terms.

(b) No loan shall be made for the initial phase of new small craft harbor projects pursuant to Section 71.4 for those project facilities that produce revenues, unless the city, county, or district applying for the loan has held a public hearing on the feasibility of a private concessionaire or lessee constructing and operating the proposed project under a contract with the applicable public agency.

(c) Notice of a hearing held pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be published in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code and in two publications of general circulation of special interest to the recreational boating community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71.6.

A transfer pursuant to Section 70 or a loan pursuant to Section 71.4 shall not be made to a city, county, or district if it would provide for an indebtedness or liability contrary to the provisions of Section 18 of Article XI of the Constitution unless, at an election called by the governing body of the city, county, or district two-thirds of the qualified electors thereof voting thereat have authorized the governing body to accept, expend, and repay the amount of the indebtedness or liability under this chapter; nor shall such transfer or loan be made if written protest thereto signed by owners of one-half or more of the assessed valuation of taxable property in said city, county, or district is received by the governing body of such city, county, or district. Such election shall be held in accordance with provisions of law for the incurring of bonded indebtedness by the city, county, or district, as near as the same may be applicable. Except as may be prohibited by this section, a transfer pursuant to Section 70 or a loan pursuant to Section 71.4 may be made to a city, county, or district and it may accept such a transfer or loan, notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting or prohibiting the creation of any indebtedness on the part of the city, county, or district.

A transfer pursuant to Section 70 or a loan pursuant to Section 71.4 may be made to a city, county, or district without an election if the transfer or loan agreement provides that payments shall be made from the gross revenues of a small craft harbor, and that such gross revenues shall constitute security for such payments. Gross revenues of a small craft harbor include all charges received from, and all other income and receipts derived by the city, county, or district from, the operation of a small craft harbor.

Gross revenues include any income received by such governmental entity from any concession or other contract operations had by the entity on its harbor facilities, but does not include gross revenues to a concessioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

71.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Section 82, or any contract or agreement to the contrary, loan payments on the loan on behalf of Spud Point Marina in the County of Sonoma, as authorized by Schedule (b)(8) of Item 3680-101-516 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 1982, and administered by the division, may be renegotiated by the division and the County of Sonoma, to solve the fiscal problems involving the marina existing on the effective date of this section as enacted during the 1994 portion of the 1993–94 Regular Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 112.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

71.7.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Section 40 of this code, Section 30233 of the Public Resources Code, or any contract or agreement to the contrary, Sonoma County may provide facilities at the Spud Point Marina for commercial, recreational, or other vessels, in numbers that it determines appropriate, subject only to the following:

(a) Sonoma County may maintain an advisory committee for the Spud Point Marina, whose membership is representative of the marina users, and shall give the advisory committee at least 30 days’ notice before changing any berthing rates at the Spud Point Marina, and shall consider, but is not obligated to follow, any recommendations of the advisory committee.

(b) Sonoma County may establish different berthing rates and any other charges for commercial, recreational, or other vessels, if the board of supervisors determines that the differing rates or charges are in the public interest, and if any loans from the department are outstanding, are necessary to provide revenue to repay those loans. However, if any loans are outstanding, berthing rates at the Spud Point Marina for recreational vessels shall not exceed the highest rates charged for berthing within the Spud Point Marina market area for recreational vessels.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

71.8.

(a) A contract or agreement for a transfer pursuant to Section 70 or a loan pursuant to Section 71.4, for which gross revenues of a small craft harbor are made the security for repayment shall include, but is not limited to, provisions requiring the governing body of the city, county, or district to perform all the following:

(1) Punctually pay all installments of principal and interest on money owed to the state.

(2) Continuously operate in an efficient and economical manner all small craft harbor facilities acquired, constructed, improved, or completed in full or in part as a result of transfers or loans by the state.

(3) Make all repairs, renewals, and replacements necessary to the efficient operation of the small craft harbor facilities and to keep the facilities in good repair at all times.

(4) Preserve and protect the security interest of the state in all respects by procuring insurance on the facilities in an amount and of the type approved by the department.

(5) Subject to subdivision (c), periodically fix, prescribe, and collect fees, rentals, or other charges for services and facilities of the small craft harbor facilities sufficient to produce gross revenues adequate for payment of the following amounts in the order set forth:

(A) All installments of principal and interest on money owed the state as they come due.

(B) All expenses of operation, maintenance, and repair of the small craft harbor facilities.

(C) Any additional sums as may be required by the department for any sinking fund, reserve fund, or other special fund established for the further security of the loan or transfer or as a depreciation or other charge in connection with the small craft harbor facilities.

(6) Repay loans with regard to the revenue-producing features, as determined by the department, constructed under the loan over a period not to exceed 30 years.

(7) Repay loans with regard to the non-revenue-producing features, as determined by the department, constructed under the loan over a period not to exceed 50 years.

(b) The
 department may require the contract or agreement to include a requirement that installments of principal and interest on money owed the state shall be paid from gross revenues prior to any other expenditures from those revenues. No loan of funds shall be made to a city, county, or district unless the loan is approved by the department as conforming to the policies established by the department. A contract or agreement shall not be effective until approved by the Department of General Services for legality, form, and completeness.

(c) The fees for the use of launching ramps in a small craft harbor shall not exceed the sum of the following:

(1) The costs of operation and maintenance of the launching ramp and related harbor facilities, including, but not limited to, access to the ramp from the shore and the ocean.

(2) The prorated capital costs of that portion of the facility which is determined by the governing body of the small craft harbor or boating facility to be necessary to pay amounts specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(d) If the city, county, or district defaults on the payment of money owed the state, or otherwise fails to perform in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract or agreement, the state shall recover the defaulted loan and the department may assume the operation and maintenance of the harbor or facility or enter into one or more contracts for its operation and maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 7.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

71.9.

A city, county, or district may use any excess revenues from rates enacted pursuant to Section 71.4 or from other fees, rates, rents, or charges for services in excess of those revenues required to comply with Section 71.8 and with any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 70, for waterfront improvements, waterfront recreational programs, and purchases of other waterfront property in the waterfront area under its jurisdiction.

This section does not in any way affect the duties and obligations imposed upon a city, county, or district by any statute granting to any city, county, or district any state-owned tide or submerged lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

72.

(a) If the legislative body of a city, county, or district has acquired, constructed, or improved small craft harbor facilities pursuant to an agreement or contract for a transfer pursuant to Section 70, or a loan pursuant to Section 71.4, the facilities may not be leased in whole or in part to a private concessionaire or lessee until the legislative body has published a notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code inviting bids and has otherwise complied with this section. Prior to publication of the notice, the legislative body shall obtain the approval of the department to the proposed leasing of the harbor facility and to the terms and conditions of the proposed lease. The notice shall distinctly and specifically describe the harbor facilities that are to be leased and set forth
 the period of the time for which the facilities are to be leased, and the minimum rental to be paid under the lease. The notice shall recite that the lease will reserve to the legislative body the power to fix and determine the rates to be charged by the lessee for the use by the public of the facilities. The notice also shall prominently display the statement that award of the lease by the legislative body is subject to final approval by the department, and fix a time and place for the opening of bids by the legislative body.

(b) At the time and place fixed in the notice, the legislative body shall meet and consider all bids that have been submitted. The lease shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder, but the award shall become final only after the award by the legislative body has been approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 8.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

72.2.

(a) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, if the legislative body of a city, county, or district has acquired, constructed or improved small craft harbor facilities pursuant to an agreement or contract for a transfer pursuant to Section 70 or a loan pursuant to Section 71.4 under circumstances in which the proposed lease area is land or water area and the terms of the proposed lease call for the lessee to install or construct all improvements, the land or water area may be leased by the legislative body without public bidding, but only after a public hearing, public notice of which shall be given by publication for not less than once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the land lies.

(b) Prior to publication of the public notice the legislative body shall obtain the written approval of the department to the proposed leasing of the harbor facility and the provisions of the proposed public notice. The public notice shall describe the land or water area that is to be leased, describe in general terms the nature of the development desired by the legislative body, and set forth the period of time for which the land or water area is to be leased, and the minimum rental to be paid under the lease. The public notice shall recite that the lease will reserve to the legislative body the power to fix and determine the rates to be charged by the lessee for the use by the public of facilities developed by the lessee. The public notice also shall contain a prominent statement that award of the lease by the legislative body is subject to final approval by the department, and fix a time and place for the public hearing by the legislative body.
 The public notice shall invite proposals for leasing from any and all interested parties.

(c) At the time and place fixed in the public notice of hearing, the legislative body shall meet and consider the lease proposal submitted. The award of the lease shall become final only after the award by the legislative body has been approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 9.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

72.4.

An agreement or contract for a transfer pursuant to former Section 5823 of the Public Resources Code or a loan pursuant to former Section 5827 or 6499.5 of that code, executed prior to the effective date of this chapter, shall, for the purposes of this chapter, be considered as an agreement or contract executed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 341.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

72.5.

(a) The Division, subject to the approval of the Legislature in accordance with Section 85.2, may grant funds to a county, city, district, or other public agency for the construction and development of small craft launching facilities and shall establish general policies for determining those projects for launching facilities
 that the division will recommend to the Legislature for grants of Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund moneys on the basis of which facilities will serve the public recreational boating needs.

(b) This program is to build launching facilities in areas not normally considered by other state agencies as suitable to provide for conservation, propagation, and utilization of the fish and game resources of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 66.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

72.6.

Transfers pursuant to Section 70, loans pursuant to Section 71.4, and grants pursuant to Section 72.5 shall be made by the division with the advice of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 113.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

72.7.

(a) The department may grant funds to any public agency for the construction or procurement of floating restrooms and ancillary items.

(b) The department may prepare plans and arrange for the procurement of floating restrooms and ancillary items for later transfer to other public agencies. All procurements shall be conducted under the supervision of the Department of General Services, in accordance with the requirements for state procurement of materials, supplies, and equipment established in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) The department shall establish general policies for determining appropriate bodies of water and locations thereon for placing floating restrooms. The department may adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the purpose of this section is to furnish restroom facilities on bodies of water where conventional restrooms cannot meet the needs of boaters and where the presence of floating restrooms may lessen environmental degradation of those bodies of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72.75.

(a) The department may grant funds to any public agency for the construction or procurement of vessel pumpout or dump stations and ancillary items.

(b) The department shall establish general policies for determining appropriate bodies of water and locations thereon for placing vessel pumpout or dump stations. The department may adopt rules and regulations that it finds necessary to carry out this section.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this section is to furnish vessel pumpout or dump station facilities on bodies of water where needed to meet the needs of boaters and where the presence of the vessel pumpout or dump stations may lessen environmental degradation of those bodies of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1233, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

72.8.

The department, subject to a line item appropriation by the Legislature for each proposed project, may grant funds to a county, city, district, or federal agency for the construction of waterway public access facilities used primarily by rafters, canoeists, tubers, and kayakers.

Funds used to implement this section shall be derived from any bond act approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72.9.

The department, subject to a line item appropriation by the Legislature for each proposed project, may acquire property to provide for waterway public access facilities used primarily by rafters, canoeists, tubers, and kayakers, and may also provide for the construction of those facilities, subject to the approval of any state agency that owns the property upon which the facilities will be constructed.

Funds used to implement this section shall be derived from any bond act approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vessels and Vessel Operators [75. - 75.]

75.

The department has such powers and duties relating to vessels and vessel operators as are imposed upon the department by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 650) of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Recreational Marinas [76. - 77.1.]

76.

It is the intent of the Legislature that Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund moneys be used to implement the intent of Section 71.5 by providing loans directly to private recreational marina owners for the design, acquisition, development, expansion, and improvement of boating facilities. It is the further intent of the Legislature that borrowers receiving loans not charge unreasonably high boat berthing fees at their harbor facilities, but that those borrowers be entitled to charge rates that provide for servicing of borrowed indebtedness obtained to develop those facilities, provide for other expenses incurred in operating the facilities, establish reasonable reserves for repairs, maintenance, and replacement of those facilities, and provide a reasonable return on the borrower’s invested
 capital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 10.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

76.1.

“Private marina owner” means a profit-oriented business enterprise which owns and operates, or intends to develop and operate, a small boat recreational facility providing boat berthing on a wet or dry storage basis and other improvements commonly found in a facility of that type on privately or publicly owned waters within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1307, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76.2.

“Recreational marina” means a marina owned by a private marina owner which is used by the public primarily for recreational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1307, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76.3.

(a) The department may make loans to private marina owners to develop a recreational marina. Loan funds from the department may be utilized for both of the following:
